Washington statutes.
RCW 35.83.050

Advances to housing authority.

Any city, town, or county located in whole or in part within the area of operation of a housing authority shall have the power from time to time to lend or donate money to such authority or to agree to take such action. Such housing authority, when it has money available therefor, shall make reimbursements for all such loans made to it.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.83.050. Prior: 1939 c 24 s 6; RRS s 6889-36. Formerly RCW 74.28.050.]